Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 5
RIGHTS - EXEMPTIONS - DUTIES

28-3-501. Nonliability for official acts.

The commanding officer of any of the military forces engaged in the suppression of an insurrection, the dispersion of a mob, or the enforcement of the laws shall exercise his or her discretion as to the propriety of firing upon or otherwise attacking any mob or other unlawful assembly; and, if he or she exercises his or her honest judgment thereon, he or she shall not be liable in either a civil or a criminal action for any act done while on such duty. No officer or enlisted person shall be held liable in either a civil or criminal action for any act done under lawful orders and in the performance of his or her duty.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 623, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-45.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-45.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 597, § 38, effective May 24.

28-3-502. Actions against military personnel - defense counsel.

If a suit or proceeding is commenced in any court by any person against any officer of the military forces for any act done by such officer in his or her official capacity in the discharge of any duty under this article, or against any enlisted person acting under the authority or order of any such officer, or by virtue of any warrant issued by him or her pursuant to law, it is the duty of the governor, upon the recommendation of the attorney general, to appoint counsel to defend such person. The cost and expenses of any such defense shall be paid out of the military fund.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 623, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-46.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-46.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 598, § 39, effective May 24.

28-3-503. Actions against military personnel - cost bond.

Any person bringing an action or proceeding against a military officer of the state for any act done in the course of his or her official duty or against any person acting under the order or authority of such officer shall give security for the costs, disbursements, and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the state or defendant in defending the same in the same manner and subject to the same regulations, so far as applicable, as in the case of a nonresident plaintiff, and, if the plaintiff fails to recover, such attorney fees may be taxed with the costs and disbursements and judgment therefor entered against him or her and his or her sureties on the bond.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 623, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-47.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-47.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 598, § 40, effective May 24.

28-3-504. Exemption from traffic regulations.

The military forces of the United States and of the state and the adjutant general and general officers of such forces with official insignia displayed, while on any authorized duty, shall not be restricted by state or municipal traffic regulations and shall have the right-of-way on any street or highway through which they may pass against except carriers of the United States mail, fire engines, and police vehicles.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 623, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-48.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-48.

28-3-505. Discrimination - public places and common carriers - penalty.

It is unlawful for any common carrier, innkeeper, proprietor, or lessee of any place of public amusement or entertainment or any agent, servant, or representative of any such common carrier, innkeeper, proprietor, or lessee as aforesaid to bar from the full and equal enjoyment of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any public conveyance or any inn or of any place of public amusement or entertainment any person in the service of the armed forces of the United States or of the National Guard, wearing the uniform prescribed for him or her at that time or place by law, regulation of the service, or custom, on account of his or her wearing such uniform or of his or her being in such service. Any person who is barred from such enjoyment contrary to the provisions contained in this section is entitled to recover in an action against any corporation, association, or person who commits such violation his or her actual damages and three hundred dollars in addition thereto and reasonable attorney fees and costs. Evidence that such person barred was at the time sober, orderly, and willing to pay for such enjoyment in accordance with rates affixed therefor for civilians shall be prima facie evidence that he or she was barred on account of his or her wearing such uniform or of his or her being in such service.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 624, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-49.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-49.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 587, § 12, effective July 1.

28-3-506. Discrimination against employment - penalty.

No person shall discriminate against any officer or enlisted person of the military forces of the state because of the officer or enlisted person's membership therein.

No employer or officer or agent of any corporation, company, or firm or other person shall:

Refuse to hire any person for or discharge any person from employment because of the person's status as an officer or enlisted person of the military forces of the state; or

Hinder or prevent the person from performing any military service he or she may be called upon to perform by proper authority; or

Dissuade any person from enlistment in the said National Guard by threat or injury to such person, if he or she so enlists, in respect to the person's employment, trade, or business.

Any person violating any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars. In addition, the aggrieved person may bring an action at law for damages for such noncompliance or apply to the district court for such equitable relief as is just and proper under the circumstances.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 624, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-50.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-50.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 588, § 13, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 693, § 2, effective July 1.

28-3-507. Interference with duty - arrest - penalty.

Any person who obstructs or interferes with a member of the National Guard in the performance of his or her duty may be placed under guard by the officer in command. As soon as possible, such officer shall either release such person or turn him or her over to any peace officer of the city or place where such duty is being performed, and such peace officer shall thereupon deliver such offender for examination and trial before any court having jurisdiction. Any person violating the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 624, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-51.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-51.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 588, § 14, effective May 24.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3244, § 491, effective March 1, 2022.